Illinois, session 104th, HB4955.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Employee Ownership Development Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Broad-based employee ownership" means an ownership 8structure in which a majority of the equity interest in a 9business is held, directly or indirectly, by or on behalf of a 10broad base of the business's employees through an employee 11stock ownership plan, worker cooperative, employee ownership 12trust, or other similar structure that provides for meaningful 13employee participation in ownership.14    "Employee ownership capital" means financing for 15investments that facilitate the transition of businesses to 16broad-based employee ownership or that provide growth capital 17to existing majority employee-owned businesses.18    "Employee ownership development firm" means an entity 19that: (i) provides financing for transitions of businesses to 20broad-based employee ownership or growth capital to existing 21majority employee-owned businesses; and (ii) has a track 22record of identifying, evaluating, and investing in employee 23ownership transactions or demonstrates a credible and   HB4955- 2 -LRB104 18508 SPS 31950 b1concerted effort to develop a pipeline of employee ownership 2transactions that meet certain criteria as determined by the 3State Treasurer.4    "Employee ownership project" means an investment that: (i) 5facilitates the transition of a business in this State to 6broad-based employee ownership; (ii) provides growth capital 7to an existing majority employee-owned business in this State; 8or (iii) otherwise supports the development or expansion of 9broad-based employee ownership in this State. 10    Section 10. Employee Ownership Development Account.11    (a) The State Treasurer shall segregate a portion of the 12Treasurer's State investment portfolio, which at no time shall 13be greater than 5% of the portfolio, in the Employee Ownership 14Development Account, an account that shall be maintained 15separately and apart from other moneys invested by the State 16Treasurer. Distributions from the investments in the Employee 17Ownership Development Account may be reinvested into the 18Employee Ownership Development Account without being counted 19against the 2% cap. The aggregate investment in the Employee 20Ownership Development Account and the aggregate commitment of 21investment capital in an Employee Ownership Development 22Account-Recipient Fund shall at no time be greater than 5% of 23the State's investment portfolio, which shall be calculated 24as: (i) the balance at the inception of the State fiscal year; 25or (ii) the average balance in the immediately preceding 5   HB4955- 3 -LRB104 18508 SPS 31950 b1fiscal years, whichever is greater. Any distributions from an 2Employee Ownership Development Account-Recipient Fund, in an 3amount not to exceed the commitment amount and the total 4distributions, may be reinvested into the Employee Ownership 5Development Account without being counted against the 5% cap. 6The State Treasurer may make investments from the Employee 7Ownership Development Account that help attract, assist, and 8support quality employee ownership development projects in 9this State. A portion of the investment earnings on the 10Employee Ownership Development Account may be deposited into 11the Employee Ownership Development Fund and reinvested by the 12State Treasurer.13    (b) The State Treasurer may solicit proposals from 14entities to manage the Employee Ownership Development Account 15consisting of investments from private sector investors that 16must invest, at the direction of the general partner, in 17tandem with the Employee Ownership Development Account in a 18pro rata portion. The State Treasurer may enter into an 19agreement with the entity managing the Employee Ownership 20Development Account to advise on the investment strategy of 21the Employee Ownership Development Account and fulfill other 22mutually agreeable terms. All funds in the Employee Ownership 23Development Account shall be kept separate and apart from 24moneys in the State treasury.25    (c) All or a portion of the moneys in the Employee 26Ownership Development Account shall be invested by the State   HB4955- 4 -LRB104 18508 SPS 31950 b1Treasurer to provide employee ownership capital to employee 2ownership development projects seeking to locate, expand, or 3remain in this State by placing money with employee ownership 4development firms. The State Treasurer shall invest primarily 5through employee ownership-focused credit funds, private 6equity funds, and similar investment vehicles rather than 7engaging in direct lending or loan origination. In no case 8shall more than 15% of the capital in the Employee Ownership 9Development Account be invested in firms based outside of this 10State that do not demonstrate a credible and concerted effort 11to develop a pipeline of employee ownership projects.12    (d) Any Employee Ownership Development Account-Recipient 13Fund created by an employee ownership development firm in 14which the State Treasurer places money in accordance with this 15Section shall be required by the State Treasurer to seek 16investments in employee ownership projects. Any Employee 17Ownership Development Account-Recipient Fund created by an 18employee ownership development firm in which the State 19Treasurer places money under this Section shall invest a 20minimum of 1.5 times the aggregate amount of investable 21capital that is received from the State Treasurer under this 22Section in employee ownership projects during the life of the 23fund. Investable capital is calculated as committed capital, 24as defined in the firm's applicable fund's governing 25documents, less related estimated fees and expenses to be 26incurred during the life of the fund. Transactions outside of   HB4955- 5 -LRB104 18508 SPS 31950 b1this State shall be expressly permitted beyond this floor, 2enabling fund managers to maintain diversified multi-state 3portfolios while developing an Illinois-focused deal pipeline.4    (e) All Employee Ownership Development Account-Recipient 5Funds shall also invest additional capital in employee 6ownership projects during the life of the fund if, as 7determined by the fund's manager, the investment:8        (1) is consistent with the firm's fiduciary 9    responsibility to its limited partners;10        (2) is consistent with the fund manager's investment 11    strategy; and12        (3) demonstrates the potential to create risk-adjusted 13    financial returns consistent with the fund manager's 14    investment goals.15    (f) Employee Ownership Development Account-Recipient Funds 16shall be permitted to deploy capital into:17        (1) subordinated loans and mezzanine debt that sit 18    junior to senior bank loans, but senior to seller notes, 19    and which may include warrants where appropriate;20        (2) preferred or structured equity in majority 21    employee-owned firms seeking growth capital, potentially 22    paired with warrants, so long as they are not unduly 23    dilutive of majority employee ownership; and24        (3) other instruments as determined appropriate by the 25    State Treasurer to facilitate broad-based employee 26    ownership.  HB4955- 6 -LRB104 18508 SPS 31950 b1    (g) The State Treasurer's investment policy shall restrict 2the use of proceeds from the Employee Ownership Development 3Account to transactions that deliver majority broad-based 4employee ownership through an employee stock ownership plan, 5worker cooperative, employee ownership trust, or other 6structure approved by the State Treasurer.7    (h) All Employee Ownership Development Account-Recipient 8Funds shall report the following information to the State 9Treasurer on a quarterly or annual basis, as determined by the 10State Treasurer, for all investments, including, but not 11limited to:12        (1) the names of companies or employee ownership 13    projects invested in during the applicable investment 14    period;15        (2) the geographic location of employee ownership 16    projects;17        (3) the date of the initial and any follow-on 18    investments;19        (4) the cost of the investment;20        (5) the current fair market value of the investment;21        (6) the number of employees at each portfolio company 22    at the time of investment and at each subsequent reporting 23    period; and24        (7) the percentage of employee ownership achieved in 25    each transaction.26    (i) If, as of the earlier to occur of (i) the fourth year   HB4955- 7 -LRB104 18508 SPS 31950 b1of the investment period of any Employee Ownership Development 2Account-Recipient Fund or (ii) when that Employee Ownership 3Development Account-Recipient Fund has drawn more than 60% of 4the investable capital of all limited partners, that Employee 5Ownership Development Account-Recipient Fund fails to invest 6the minimum amount required under this Section in employee 7ownership projects, then the State Treasurer shall deliver 8written notice to the manager of that fund seeking compliance 9with the minimum amount requirement under this Section. If, 10after 180 days after delivery of notice, the Employee 11Ownership Development Account-Recipient Fund still fails to 12invest the minimum amount required under this Section in 13employee ownership projects, then the State Treasurer may 14elect, in writing, to terminate any further commitment to make 15capital contributions to that fund which otherwise would have 16been made under this Section.17    (j) The Employee Ownership Development Account and 18investments made in the Employee Ownership Development Account 19shall be managed in compliance with the State Treasurer's 20Responsible Contractor Policy and the Illinois Sustainable 21Investing Act. 22    Section 15. Employee Ownership Development Fund. The 23Employee Ownership Development Fund is created as a 24non-appropriated trust fund within the State treasury, which 25may receive a portion of earnings from the Employee Ownership   HB4955- 8 -LRB104 18508 SPS 31950 b1Development Account and may be used by the State Treasurer to 2pay expenses related to this Act, including, but not limited 3to, consulting with external advisors to assist with manager 4selection, due diligence, and monitoring. 5    Section 20. Annual report. Beginning one year after the 6effective date of this Act, and annually thereafter, the State 7Treasurer shall submit a report to the General Assembly 8concerning the activities and performance of the Employee 9Ownership Development Account. The report shall include:10        (1) the total amount invested in the Employee 11    Ownership Development Account;12        (2) a summary of investments made through Employee 13    Ownership Development Account-Recipient Funds;14        (3) the number and geographic distribution of employee 15    ownership projects financed;16        (4) the estimated number of workers in this State who 17    have become employee-owners as a result of investments 18    made under this Act; and19        (5) the financial performance of the Employee 20    Ownership Development Account. 21    Section 25. Rules. The State Treasurer may adopt rules 22necessary to implement this Act. 23    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 24becoming law.